Illinois, session 104th, SB2429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5University Construction Management Autonomy Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. This Act aims to grant public 7universities in the State the authority to independently 8manage construction projects funded by the State, up to a 9maximum of $20,000,000, without the oversight of the Capital 10Development Board (CDB). Additionally, it provides 11universities with the option to use the services of the CDB 12should they determine it to be advantageous to the 13university's interests. 14    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Capital Development Board" or "CDB" means the State 16agency responsible for overseeing and managing construction 17projects funded by the State.18    "Construction projects" means any building, renovation, or 19infrastructure project undertaken by a public university for 20the purposes of expanding or maintaining its campus 21facilities.22    "Public universities" means any educational institution in   SB2429- 2 -LRB104 10484 LNS 20559 b1the State that receives State funding and is governed by the 2Board of Higher Education. 3    Section 15. Granting autonomy.4    (a) Public universities in the State shall be granted 5autonomy to manage construction projects funded by the State, 6as long as the total State funding does not exceed 7$20,000,000.8    (b) The autonomy granted to universities shall include the 9authority to:10        (1) Develop and approve project plans, budgets, and 11    timelines.12        (2) Select contractors, architects, and other 13    necessary personnel for the project.14        (3) Procure materials and equipment necessary for the 15    project in compliance with State statutes, rules, and 16    standards.17        (4) Monitor and oversee the progress of the project to 18    ensure compliance with State rules and standards.19    (c) Public universities shall be responsible for the 20proper allocation and use of State funds allocated for 21construction projects under their management. 22    Section 20. Option to use Capital Development Board.23    (a) Public universities shall have the option to use the 24services of the Capital Development Board for construction   SB2429- 3 -LRB104 10484 LNS 20559 b1projects, if they determine it to be in the best interests of 2the university.3    (b) Universities opting to use the services of the CDB 4shall enter into agreements outlining the scope of work, 5responsibilities, and any associated costs.6    (c) The decision to use the CDB shall be made by the 7governing body of the respective university, such as the Board 8of Trustees or equivalent authority. 9    Section 25. Reporting requirements. Public universities 10availing themselves of the autonomy granted under this Act 11shall provide regular reports to the Board of Higher Education 12detailing the progress, expenditures, and outcomes of 13construction projects managed independently. 14    Section 30. Severability. If any provision of this Act is 15found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining 16provisions shall remain in full force and effect. 17    Section 35. Repeal. Any laws or provisions in conflict 18with this Act are hereby repealed. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.